Hawaii, session 2025, SB656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Red Hill Bulk Fuel Storage Facility has been identified as a source of contamination, posing a significant risk to Oahu's municipal water system.  The contamination plume is migrating in a northwesterly direction, threatening the safety and quality of the water supply. Accurate data collection and mapping of the plume's migration is necessary for effective mitigation and protection of the public health. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the installation of one hundred monitoring wells contamination to collect data and map the migration of the Red Hill plume. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the installation of one hundred monitoring wells to collect data and map the migration of the Red Hill contamination plume. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________